Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
287

MOTOR
VEHICLE SAFETY RESPONSIBILITY ACT

Section

287-1 Definitions

287-2 Administrator to administer chapter;
appeal to

circuit court

287-3 Furnishing of operating records

287-4 Report required following accident

287-5 Security required unless evidence of
insurance

287-6 Suspension of license

287-7 Exceptions

287-8 Further exceptions to requirement of
security

287-9 Duration of suspension

287-10 Application to nonresidents and unlicensed
drivers

287-11 Form and amount of security

287-12 Custody, disposition, and return of
security

287-13 Repealed

287-14 Matters not to be evidence in civil court

287-15 Report of nonpayment of judgments

287-16 Suspension for nonpayment of judgment; exceptions

287-17 Suspension to continue until judgments
paid and

proof given

287-18 Payment sufficient to satisfy requirements

287-19 Installment payment of judgment; default

287-20 Proof of financial responsibility required
upon

conviction of certain offenses

287-21 Alternate methods of giving proof

287-22 Certificate of insurance as proof

287-22.1 Certificate of insurance as proof;
mandatory, when

287-23 Certificate furnished by nonresident as
proof

287-24 Motor vehicle liability policy defined

287-25 Owner's policy requirements

287-26 Driver's policy requirements

287-27 Contents of motor vehicle liability policy

287-28 Liabilities which need not be covered

287-29 General provisions governing liability
policies

287-30 Excess coverage permitted

287-31 Reimbursement of insurer; proration of
insurance

287-32 Combining policies and issuing binders to
meet

requirements

287-33 Notice of cancellation or termination of
certified

policy

287-34 Chapter not to affect other policies

287-35 Bond as proof

287-36 Money or bonds as proof

287-37 Owner may give proof for others

287-38 Substitution of proof

287-39 Other proof may be required

287-40 Duration of proof; when proof may be
canceled or

returned

287-41 Surrender of license on violation

287-42 Self-insurers

287-43 Assigned risk plans

287-44 Penalties

287-45 Exceptions

287-46 Chapter supplemental to traffic ordinances
and motor

vehicle laws

287-47 Other relief available

287-48 Application of chapter to suspensions and
revocations

prior to January 1, 1950

Cross References

Nonresident violator compact, see chapter 291A.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next